Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Kentucky Peace Corps

154.01-700.
Definitions for KRS 154.01-700 to 154.01-745. [Renumbered.]

154.01-705.
Kentucky Peace Corps Governing Board. [Renumbered.]

154.01-710.
Duties of board. [Renumbered.]

154.01-715.
Additional duties of board. [Renumbered.]

154.01-720.
Kentucky Peace Corps — Purpose — Director. [Renumbered.]

154.01-725.
Duties of director. [Renumbered.]

154.01-730.
Salaries of director and employees — Unclassified status of employees. [Renumbered.]

154.01-735.
Qualifications, benefits, and requirements for volunteers. [Renumbered.]

154.01-740.
Discipline of volunteers. [Renumbered.]

154.01-745.
Purchase of retirement credit by volunteers. [Renumbered.]